Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 6.1 Railroad Preservation

39-6.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agent for the state” means and includes the department of transportation as agent for the state as that term is used in 49 U.S.C. § 1654 and any amendments to it.

“Department” means the department of transportation or other appropriate state agency of this state.

“Includes” and variants of it should be read as if the phrase “but is not limited to” were also set forth.

“Persons” means individuals, corporations, partnerships, or foreign and domestic associations.

“Rail properties” means assets or rights, both real and personal, owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by a railroad that are used or useful in providing rail transportation service.

“Rail service” means both freight and passenger service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-2.
General powers of department.

The department is hereby authorized to exercise those powers necessary for the state to qualify for rail service assistance pursuant to the provisions of 49 U.S.C. § 1654 or other applicable federal laws, including authority:

To establish a state plan for rail transportation and local rail services.

To administer and coordinate the state plan.

To provide in the plan for the equitable distribution of federal rail service assistance.

To promote, operate, supervise, and support safe, adequate, and efficient rail services, or to enter into contractual relationships with public or private agencies, persons, or corporations to do so.

To employ sufficient trained and qualified personnel for these purposes.

To maintain adequate programs of investigation, research, promotion, and development in connection with such purposes and to provide for public participation therein.

To provide satisfactory assurances on behalf of the state that fiscal control and fund accounting procedures will be adopted by the state as may be necessary to assure proper disbursement of and accounting of federal funds paid to the state as rail service assistance.

To comply with the regulation of the Secretary of Transportation of the United States Department of Transportation affecting federal rail service programs.

To do all things otherwise necessary to maximize federal assistance to the state under 49 U.S.C. § 1654 or other applicable federal laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-3.
Assistance to rail lines.

The department is hereby authorized to provide financial assistance, within the limits of the funds appropriated for this purpose, for the continuation of operations and maintenance of any railroad within or serving the state as provided for in 49 U.S.C. § 1654 or other relevant federal legislation. The department may also act as the agent in cooperation with any transportation authority, local governmental units, any group of rail users, or any person, and the federal government in any rail service assistance program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-4.
Access to information.

The department, in performing its planning function, is authorized to request any railroad to provide such data and information as are necessary for the planning process. Railroads operating within the state shall provide the information within sixty (60) days of the date of the request. The department shall exercise all necessary caution to avoid disclosure of confidential information supplied under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 143, § 1.

39-6.1-5.
Acquisition and necessity.

The department, as sole agent for the state, may acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise, any portion or portions of the rail property of any railroad corporation, including the tracks and ties, rights of way, land, buildings, appurtenances, and other facilities necessary for the operation of railroads. In addition, the department may so acquire, improve, and maintain any other property found by the department to be necessary for the operation of a railroad subject to the approval of the state properties committee.

The authority to so acquire rail properties extends to rail properties both within and not within the jurisdiction of the Interstate Commerce Commission. It also includes rail properties within the purview of 49 U.S.C. § 1654, any amendments to it, and any other relevant federal legislation.

The acquisition of the rail properties, and other property, by the department is for the purpose of the continued and future operation of a railroad deemed to be in the public interest. The acquisition of the rail properties and other property is declared to be a public purpose and to be reasonably necessary. This action may be taken in concert with another state or states as necessary to insure continued rail service in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-6.
Operation, sale, or lease.

The department may operate itself or may sell, transfer, or lease all, or any part, of the rail properties and other property acquired under the provisions of this chapter to any responsible person, firm, or corporation, whether private, quasi-public, or public, for continued operation and maintenance of a railroad, or other public purpose, provided that approval for the continued operation, or other public purpose is granted by the Interstate Commerce Commission of the United States, whenever approval is required. The sale, transfer, or lease shall be for a price, and subject to any further terms and conditions the department feels are necessary and appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and subject to the approval of the state properties committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-7.
Interstate Commerce Commission certificate.

After acquiring any railroad lines within the state, the department shall assist any responsible person, firm, or corporation, to secure, as promptly as possible, any order or certificate required by the Interstate Commerce Commission for the performance of railroad service. The department shall also give any assurances or guarantees that are necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-8.
Title to property of railroads.

The department may take whatever steps are necessary in order to determine the absolute fee simple title ownership of all rail properties of any railroad within the state. The determination may include the status of the rail properties with respect to easements, rights of way, leases, reversionary rights, fee simple title ownership, and any and all related title matters. The department may retain attorneys, experts, or other assistants, and issue any contracts as are necessary to make the title determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-9.
Sale of rail properties.

All rail properties within the state offered for sale by any railway corporation after April 9, 1976, shall be offered for sale to the state in the first instance at the lowest price at which the railway corporation is willing to sell. The railway corporation shall notify the state in writing if it desires to offer for sale any rail properties. The state shall have a period of not more than ninety (90) days from receipt of the notification to accept the offer. If the offer is not accepted in writing within the period of time, the railway corporation shall be free to sell the rail properties to any other party. For purposes of this section only, rail properties shall mean only those rail properties for which permission to abandon rail lines thereon has not been granted by the Interstate Commerce Commission at the time of offer for sale. This section shall apply only to the sale of rail properties and not the sale of easements or similar interests in rail properties. No person, firm, or corporation shall be permitted to take any of the properties of a railway corporation by condemnation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 332, § 1.

39-6.1-10.
Cooperation between states.

The department may cooperate with other states in connection with the purchase, operation, or assistance of or to any rail properties within this state. The department may also acquire trackage rights in other states and rail properties lying in other states in order to carry out the intentions and purposes of this chapter. In carrying out the authority conferred by this section, the department may enter into general contractual arrangements, including joint purchasing and leasing of rail properties, with other states.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-10.1.
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority (“MBTA”), a body politic and corporate and a political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, and all its real and personal property shall be exempt from taxation and from betterments and special assessments; and the MBTA shall not be required to pay any tax, excise, or assessment to or for this state or any of its political subdivisions; nor shall the MBTA be required to pay any fee or charge for any permit or license, nor any compliance fee, issued to it by this state, by any department, board, or officer thereof, or by any political subdivision of this state; and the MBTA shall be exempt from tolls for the use of highways, bridges, and tunnels. Bonds and notes issued by the MBTA in support of purchases and/or improvements for maintaining and/or improving commuter rail service to and/or within the state of Rhode Island, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation with this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 386, § 2.

39-6.1-11.
Cooperation between the department and local governmental units.

In weighing the varied interests of the residents of this state, the department shall give consideration, as best as the situation allows, to the individual interest of any city or town expressing a desire to acquire a portion, or all, of the abandoned real estate located within its jurisdiction. The department may exercise its powers under this chapter to acquire the abandoned property for subsequent conveyance to the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-12.
Federal funds — Appropriations.

The department may utilize federal funds, grants, gifts, or donations that are available, and any sums that are appropriated, in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. The department may apply for entitlement or other funds available under the provisions of 49 U.S.C. § 1654 or other federal programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-13.
Application for federal loans.

The department may apply for a loan or a guarantee of a loan under any applicable federal local rail assistance programs, within the limit of funds appropriated for those purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 13.

39-6.1-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 14; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 143, § 2.

39-6.1-15.
Purchase of rolling stock, equipment, and machinery.

The department is authorized to purchase any railroad rolling stock, equipment, and machinery necessary for the operation and maintenance of any rail properties purchased by it on behalf of the state, with any funds made available for this purpose. The department may also acquire, and have available, a pool of equipment and machinery that may be utilized by the operators of the rail properties for the purpose of track maintenance, and other related railroad activities, upon terms and conditions determined by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-16.
Rebuilding, modernization, and maintenance of rail properties.

The department may contract for the rebuilding or relocation of any rail properties acquired pursuant to this chapter, within the provisions of 49 U.S.C. § 1654 or any other appropriate legislation. The department may also spend any sums appropriated, as well as any other available funds, for the modernization, rebuilding, and relocation of any rail properties owned by the state or by a private carrier. The department may do any maintenance on any rail properties owned by the state as is necessary in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-17.
Authorization to contract to improve rail transportation service.

The department may contract with any domestic or foreign person, firm, corporation, agency, or government to provide, operate, maintain, or improve rail transportation service on the rail properties acquired by the state under this chapter, or may provide such services, operation, and maintenance itself.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-18.
Disposition of acquired rail properties.

Whenever the department determines that any rail properties acquired by the state are no longer needed for railroad purposes, it may, with the permission of the governor, permanently or temporarily transfer the rail properties to any other state department or agency, or political subdivision of the state, which shall utilize the properties for a public purpose. Whenever more than one department or agency, or political subdivision, wishes to utilize the property, the department shall resolve such a conflict and make a prompt determination of the reasonable and proper order of priority, taking into consideration any applicable state plans, policies, and objectives. If no state department or agency or political subdivision wants the properties, the department may sell them; provided, however, that all dispositions shall be with the approval of the state properties committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-19.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall, from time to time, appropriate such funds as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.

39-6.1-20.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with and for the purpose of adequately implementing the foregoing provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 28, § 1.